en: PET - Colored, Colored PET
da: PET - farvet, farvet PET
de: PET - Gefärbtes, Farbiges PET
es: PET - coloreado, PET coloreado
fr: PET - coloré, PET coloré
hu: PET - Színezet, színes PET
it: PET - colorato, PET colorato
nl: PET - gekleurd, Gekleurd PET
pt: PET - colorido
sv: PET - färgat, färgat PET

en: PET - Opaque, Opaque PET
da: PET - ugennemsigtig, ugennemsigtig PET
de: PET - Undurchsichtiges, Intransparentes PET
es: PET - opaco
fr: PET - opaque
it: PET - opaco
nl: PET - ondoorzichtig, Ondoorzichtig PET
pt: PET - opaco

en: PE 7 - Polyethylene, PE - Polyethylene, Polyethylene
xx: PE, 07 PE, PE 07, 07PE, PE07, 7 PE, PE 7, 7PE, PE7
bg: PE 7 - Полиетилен, PE - Полиетилен, Полиетилен
ca: PE 7- polietilè, PE - polietilè, polietilè
cs: PE 7 - polyethylen, PE - polyethylen, polyethylen
da: PE 7 - polyethylen, PE - polyethylen, polyethylen
de: PE 7 - Polyethylen, PE - Polyethylen, Polyethylen
el: PE 7 - Πολυαιθυλένιο, PE - Πολυαιθυλένιο, Πολυαιθυλένιο
es: PE 7 - polietileno, PE - polietileno, polietileno
et: PE 7 - polüeteen, PE - polüeteen, polüeteen
fi: PE 7 - polyeteeni, PE - polyeteeni, polyeteeni
fr: PE 7 - Polyéthylène, PE - Polyéthylène, Polyéthylène
hr: PE 7 - Polietilen, PE - Polietilen, Polietilen
hu: PE 7 - polietilén, PE - polietilén, polietilén
is: PE 7 - Fjöletýlen, PE - Fjöletýlen, Fjöletýlen
it: PE 7 - polietilene, PE - polietilene, polietilene
lt: PE 7 - Polietilenas, PE - Polietilenas, Polietilenas
lv: PE 7 - Polietilēns, PE - Polietilēns, Polietilēns
nb: PE 7 - polyetenpolyeten, PE - polyetenpolyeten, polyeten
nl: PE 7 - polyetheen, PE - polyetheen, polyetheen
nn: PE 7 - polyetylen, PE - polyetylen, polyetylen
pl: PE 7 - polietylen, PE - polietylen, polietylen
pt: PE 7 - polietileno, PE - polietileno, polietileno
ro: PE 7 - Polietilenă, PE - Polietilenă, Polietilenă
ru: PE 7 - полиэтилен, PE - полиэтилен, полиэтилен
sk: PE 7 - Polyetylén, PE - Polyetylén, Polyetylén
sl: PE 7 - Polieten, PE - Polieten, Polieten
sq: PE 7 - Polietileni, PE - Polietileni, Polietileni
sv: PE 7 - polyeten, - polyeten, polyeten
uk: PE 7 - поліетилен, PE - поліетилен, поліетилен

en: bioPE - Biobased, Biobased PE
xx: Bio-PE, bioPE, bPE
de: bioPE - Biobasiertes, Biobasiertes PE
fr: bioPE - biosourcé, PE biosourcé
hu: bioPE - Biobázisú, Biobázisú PE
nl: bioPE - Biobased, Biobased PE
pt: bioPE - Bioplástico, Bioplástico P

en: HDPE 2 - High-density polyethylene, HDPE - High-density polyethylene, High-density polyethylene
xx: HDPE, 2 HDPE, HDPE 2, 02 HDPE, HDPE 02, PEHD, 2 PEHD, PEHD 2, 02 PEHD, PEHD 02, HD-PE, 2 HD-PE, HD-PE 2, 02 HD-PE, HD-PE 02, PE-HD, 2 PE-HD, PE-HD 2, 02 PE-HD, PE-HD 02, RC 2, RC 02, RC2, RC02, ♴
ar: HDPE 2 - متعدد إثيلين عالي الكثافة
bg: HDPE 2 - Полиетилен с висока плътност, HDPE - Полиетилен с висока плътност, Полиетилен с висока плътност
ca: HDPE 2 - polietilè d'alta densitat, polietilè d'alta densitat
cs: HDPE 2 - Polyethylen s vysokou hustotou, Polyethylen s vysokou hustotou
de: HDPE 2 - Polyethylen hoher Dichte, HDPE - Polyethylen hoher Dichte, Polyethylen hoher Dichte
fi: HDPE 2 - suurtiheyspolyeteeni, suurtiheyspolyeteeni
fr: PEHD 2 - Polyéthylène haute densité, PEHD - Polyéthylène haute densité, polyéthylène haute densité, HDPE - 2 - Polyéthylène haute densité, Surlyn
hr: HDPE 2 - polietilen visoke gustoće, HDPE - polietilen visoke gustoće, polietilen visoke gustoće
hu: HDPE 2 - Nagy sűrűségű polietilén, Nagy sűrűségű polietilén
it: HDPE 2 - Polietilene ad alta densità, HDPE - Polietilene ad alta densità, Polietilene ad alta densità
lt: HDPE 2 - Didelio tankio polietilenas, Didelio tankio polietilenas
nl: HDPE 2 - Hogedichtheidpolyetheen, HDPE - Hogedichtheidpolyetheen, Hogedichtheidpolyetheen
nn: HDPE 2 - høgdensitetspolyetylen, høgdensitetspolyetylen
pl: HDPE 2 - polietylen wysokiej gęstości, polietylen wysokiej gęstości
pt: HDPE 2 - Polietileno de alta densidade, HDPE - Polietileno de alta densidade, Polietileno de alta densidade
ru: HDPE 2 - полиэтилен высокой плотности, полиэтилен высокой плотности
uk: HDPE 2 - Поліетилен високої щільності, Поліетилен високої щільності

en: bioHDPE - Biobased HDPE, Biobased PE-HD
xx: Bio-HDPE, bHDPE
de: bioHDPE - Biobasiertes HDPE, Biobasiertes PE-HD
es: bioHDPE - HDPE de base biológica, PE-HD de base biológica
fr: bioHDPE - PEHD biosourcé, PEHD biosourcé, HDPE biosourcé
hu: bioHDPE - Biobázisú HDPE
it: bioHDPE - HDPE biobased, PE-HD biobased
nl: bioHDPE - Biologische HDPE
pt: bioHDPE - Bioplástico PEHD

en: PVC 3 - Polyvinyl chloride, PVC - Polyvinyl chloride, Polyvinyl chloride
xx: PVC, 3 PVC, PVC 3, 03 PVC, PVC 03, 7 V, V 7, ♵
bg: PVC 3 - Поливинил хлорид, PVC - Поливинил хлорид
ca: PVC 3 - clorur de polivinil, clorur de polivinil
cs: PVC 3 - polyvinylchlorid, polyvinylchlorid
da: PVC 3 - Polyvinylchlorid, Polyvinylchlorid
de: PVC 3 - Polyvinylchlorid, PVC - Polyvinylchlorid, Polyvinylchlorid
el: PVC 3 - Πολυβινυλοχλωρίδιο, Πολυβινυλοχλωρίδιο
es: PVC 3 - cloruro de polivinilo, cloruro de polivinilo
et: PVC 3 - polüvinüülkloriid, polüvinüülkloriid
fi: PVC 3 - polyvinyylikloridi, polyvinyylikloridi
fr: PVC 3 - Polychlorure de vinyle, PVC - Polychlorure de vinyle, Polychlorure de vinyle, chlorure de polyvinyle
ga: PVC 3 - Polaiviniolclóiríd, Polaiviniolclóiríd
hr: PVC 3 - polivinil-klorid, PVC - polivinil-klorid, polivinilklorid
hu: PVC 3 - Polivinil-klorid, PVC - Polivinil-klorid, Polivinil-klorid, polivinilklorid, polivinil klorid
it: PVC 3 - Cloruro di polivinile, PVC - Cloruro di polivinile, polivinilcloruro
lt: PVC 3 - Polivinilchloridas, Polivinilchloridas
nl: PVC 3 - Polyvinylchloride, PVC - Polyvinylchloride, polychlooretheen
pt: PVC 3 - Policloreto de vinil, PVC - Policloreto de vinil, Policloreto de vinil
ro: PVC 3 - Policlorură de vinil, Policlorură de vinil
ru: ПВХ 3 - Поливинилхлорид, Поливинилхлорид
sk: PVC 3 - Polyvinylchlorid, Polyvinylchlorid
sl: PVC 3 - Polivinil klorid, Polivinil klorid
sv: PVC 3 - polyvinylklorid, polyvinylklorid

en: LDPE 4 - Low-density polyethylene, LDPE - Low-density polyethylene, Low-density polyethylene
xx: LDPE, 4 LDPE, LDPE 4, 04 LDPE, LDPE 04, PELD, 4 PELD, PELD 4, 04 PELD, PELD 04, LD-PE, 4 LD-PE, LD-PE 4, 04 LD-PE, LD-PE 04, PE-LD, 4 PE-LD, PE-LD 4, 04 PE-LD, PE-LD 04, 04 PE, ♶
bg: LDPE 4 - Полиетилен с ниска плътност, LDPE - Полиетилен с ниска плътност
ca: LDPE 4 - Polietilè de baixa densitat, Polietilè de baixa densitat
cs: LDPE 4 - Polyethylen s nízkou hustotou, Polyethylen s nízkou hustotou
de: LDPE 4 - Polyethylen niedriger Dichte, LDPE - Polyethylen niedriger Dichte, Polyethylen niedriger Dichte
es: LDPE 4 - polietileno de baja densidad, polietileno de baja densidad
fr: PEBD 4 - Polyéthylène basse densité, PEBD - Polyéthylène basse densité, polyéthylène basse densité, PEBD, PE-BD, PEBDL, PEBDL - Polyethylène basse densité linéaire
hr: LDPE 4 - polietilen niske gustoće, LDPE - polietilen niske gustoće
hu: LDPE 4 - Kis sűrűségű polietilén, LDPE - Kis sűrűségű polietilén, Kis sűrűségű polietilén
it: LDPE 4 - Polietilene a bassa densità, Polietilene a bassa densità
lt: LDPE 4 - Mažo tankio polietilenas, Mažo tankio polietilenas
nl: LDPE 4 - Lagedichtheidpolyetheen, LDPE - Lagedichtheidpolyetheen, lagedichtheidpolyetheen
nn: LDPE 4 - polyeten med låg tettleik, polyeten med låg tettleik
pl: LDPE 4 - polietylen niskiej gęstości, polietylen niskiej gęstości
pt: LDPE 4 - Polietileno de baixa densidade, LDPE - Polietileno de baixa densidade, Polietileno de baixa densidade
ru: LDPE 4 - полиэтилен низкой плотности, полиэтилен низкой плотности
uk: LDPE 4 - поліетилен низької щільності, поліетилен низької щільності

en: Bio-LDPE - Biobased LDPE, Biobased LDPE
xx: Bio-LDPE, bLDPE
ar: Bio-LDPE - LDPE الحيوي, LDPE الحيوي
bg: Bio-LDPE - Био-базиран LDPE, Био-базиран LDPE
ca: Bio-LDPE - LDPE de base biològica, LDPE de base biològica
cs: Bio-LDPE - Bio LDPE, Bio LDPE
da: Bio-LDPE - Biobaseret LDPE, Biobaseret LDPE
de: Bio-LDPE - Biobasiertes LDPE, Biobasiertes LDPE, Biobasiertes PE-LD
el: Bio-LDPE - Βιολογικό LDPE, Βιολογικό LDPE
es: Bio-LDPE - LDPE de base biológica, LDPE de base biológica
et: Bio-LDPE - Biolagunev LDPE, Biolagunev LDPE
fi: Bio-LDPE - Biopohjainen LDPE, Biopohjainen LDPE
fr: Bio-PELD - PELD biosourcé, PELD biosourcé, LDPE biosourcé
he: ביו-LDPE - LDPE ביו-מבוסס, LDPE ביו-מבוסס
hr: Bio-LDPE - Bio-bazirani LDPE, Bio-bazirani LDPE
hu: Bio-LDPE - Biobázisú LDPE, Biobázisú LDPE
it: Bio-LDPE - LDPE biologico, LDPE biologico
ja: バイオLDPE - バイオベースLDPE、バイオベースLDPE
ko: 바이오 LDPE - 바이오 기반 LDPE, 바이오 기반 LDPE
lt: Bio-LDPE - Biologinis LDPE, Biologinis LDPE
lv: Bio-LDPE - Bio LDPE, Bio LDPE
nl: Bio-LDPE - Biologische LDPE, Biologische LDPE
no: Bio-LDPE - Biobasert LDPE, Biobasert LDPE
pl: Bio-LDPE - Bio oparte LDPE, Bio oparte LDPE
pt: Bio-PELD - Bioplástico PELD, Bioplástico PELD
ro: Bio-LDPE - LDPE bio, LDPE bio
ru: Bio-LDPE - Био-основанный LDPE, Био-основанный LDPE
sk: Bio-LDPE - Bio LDPE, Bio LDPE
sl: Bio-LDPE - Bio LDPE, Bio LDPE
sv: Bio-LDPE - Biobaserad LDPE, Biobaserad LDPE
tr: Bio-LDPE - Biyo-bazlı LDPE, Biyo-bazlı LDPE
uk: Bio-LDPE - Біо-LDPE, Біо-LDPE
zh: 生物基LDPE - 生物基LDPE，生物基LDPE

en: PP 5 - Polypropylene, PP - Polypropylene, Polypropylene
xx: PP, 5 PP, PP 5, PP 05, 05 PP, PP5, ♷
bg: PP 5 - Полипропилен, PP - Полипропилен
ca: PP 5 - polipropilè, polipropilè
cs: pp 5 - polypropylen, polypropylen
da: PP 5 - polypropylen, polypropylen
de: PP 5 - Polypropylen, PP - Polypropylen, Polypropylen
el: PP 5 - Πολυπροπυλένιο, Πολυπροπυλένιο
et: PP 5 - polüpropeen, polüpropeen
fi: PP 5 - polypropeeni, polypropeeni
fr: PP 5 - Polypropylène, PP - Polypropylène, Polypropylène, polypropène
ga: PP 5 - Polaprópailéin, Polaprópailéin
hr: PP 5 - polipropilen, PP - polipropilen, polipropilen
hu: PP 5 - Polipropilén, PP - Polipropilén, Polipropilén
is: PP 5 - Fjölprópýlen, Fjölprópýlen
it: PP 5 - Polipropilene, PP - Polipropilene, Polipropilene, polipropene
lt: PP 5 - Polipropilenas, Polipropilenas
nb: PP 5 - polypropen, polypropen
nl: PP 5 - Polypropeen, PP - Polypropeen, Polypropeen, polypropyleen
nn: PP 5 - polypropylen, polypropylen
pl: PP 5 - polipropylen, polipropylen
pt: PP 5 - Polipropileno, PP - Polipropileno, Polipropileno
ro: PP 5 - Polipropilenă, Polipropilenă
ru: ПП 5 - Полипропилен, Полипропилен, PP - Полипропилен
sk: PP 5 - Polypropylén, Polypropylén
sr: PP 5 - полипропилен, полипропилен
sv: PP 5 - polypropen, polypropen
tr: PP 5 - Polipropilen, Polipropilen
uk: PP 5 - поліпропілен, поліпропілен

en: CPP - Cast PolyPropylen, Cast PolyPropylen
xx: CPP, PP-C, 05 CPP, CPP 05, 5 CPP, CPP 5, 05CPP, CPP05, 5CPP, CPP5, 05 PP-C, PP-C 05, 5 PP-C, PP-C 5, 05PP-C, PP-C05, 5PP-C, PP-C5
de: CPP - Ungerecktes Polypropylen, Ungerecktes Polypropylen
fr: CPP - Polypropylène coulé, Polypropylène coulé
nl: CPP - Gegoten polypropeen, Gegoten polypropeen

en: OPP - Oriented PolyPropylen, Oriented PolyPropylen
xx: OPP, PP-O, 05 OPP, OPP 05, 5 OPP, OPP 5, 05OPP, OPP05, 5OPP, OPP5, 05 PP-O, PP-O 05, 5 PP-O, PP-O 5, 05PP-O, PP-O05, 5PP-O, PP-O5
de: OPP - Orientiertes Polypropylen
fr: OPP - PolyPropylène Orienté, PolyPropylène Orienté
nl: OPP - Georienteerde polypropeen, Georienteerde polypropeen

en: PS 6 - Polystyrene, PS - Polystyrene, Polystyrene
xx: PS, 6 PS, PS 6, 06 PS, PS 06, ♸
bg: PS 6 - Полистирен, PS - Полистирен, Полистирен
bs: PS 6 - Polistiren, Polistiren
ca: PS 6 - poliestirè, poliestirè
cs: PS 6 - polystyren, polystyren
da: PS 6 - Polystyren, Polystyren
de: PS 6 - Polystyrol, PS - Polystyrol, Polystyrol
el: PS 6 - Πολυστυρένιο, Πολυστυρένιο
et: PS 6 - Polüstürool, Polüstürool
fi: PS 6 - Polystyreeni, Polystyreeni
fr: PS 6 - Polystyrène, PS - Polystyrène, Polystyrène
ga: PS 6 - Polaistiréin, Polaistiréin
hr: PS 6 - polistiren, PS - polistiren, Polistiren
hu: PS 6 - Polisztirol, PS - Polisztirol, Polisztirol
it: PS 6 - Polistirene, PS - Polistirene, Polistirolo
lt: PS 6 - Polistirenas, Polistirenas
lv: PS 6 - polistirols, polistirols
mk: PS 6 - Полистирен, Полистирен
nb: PS 6 - polystyren, polystyren
nl: PS 6 - Polystyreen, PS - Polystyreen, Polystyreen
nn: PS 6 - polystyren, polystyren
pl: PS 6 - polistyren, polistyren
pt: PS 6 - Poliestireno, PS - Poliestireno, Poliestireno
ro: PS 6 - Polistiren, Polistiren
ru: PS 6 - Полистирол, PS - Полистирол, Полистирол
sk: PS 6 - Polystyrén, Polystyrén
sl: PS 6 - Polistiren, Polistiren
sv: PS 6 - polystyren, polystyren
tr: PS 6 - polistiren, polistiren
uk: PS 6 - полістирол, полістирол

en: EPS - Expanded polystyrene, Foamed polystyrene
ar: EPS - البوليسترين الموسع، البوليسترين الرغوي
bg: EPS - Експандиран полистирол, разпенен полистирол
ca: EPS - poliestirè expandit, poliestirè escumat
cs: EPS - expandovaný polystyren, pěnový polystyren
da: EPS - Ekspanderet polystyren, skummet polystyren
de: EPS - Expandiertes Polystyrol, geschäumtes Polystyrol
el: EPS - διογκωμένο πολυστυρένιο, αφρώδες πολυστυρένιο
es: EPS - poliestireno expandido, poliestireno espumado
et: EPS - paisutatud polüstüreen, vahustatud polüstüreen
fi: EPS - expandeerattu polystyreeni, vaahdotettu polystyreeni
fr: PSE - Polystyrène expansé, PSE - Polystyrène expansé / moussé, Polystyrène expansé, Polystyrène moussé
hr: EPS - ekspandirani polistiren, pjenasti polistiren
hu: EPS - expandált polisztirol, habosított polisztirol
it: EPS - polistirene espanso, polistirene espanso
ja: EPS - 発泡ポリスチレン、発泡ポリスチレン
ko: EPS - 발포 폴리스티렌, 발포 폴리스티렌
lt: EPS - polistireninis putplastis, putų polistirenas
lv: EPS - putupolistirols, putu polistirols
nl: EPS - geëxpandeerd polystyreen, geschuimd polystyreen
pl: EPS - polistyren ekspandowany, polistyren piankowy
pt: EPS - poliestireno expandido, poliestireno expandido
ru: EPS - вспененный полистирол, пенополистирол
sk: EPS - expandovaný polystyrén, penový polystyrén
sl: EPS - ekspandirani polistiren, penasti polistiren
sv: EPS - expanderad polystyren, skummad polystyren
tr: EPS - Genleştirilmiş polistiren, köpük polistiren
uk: EPS - спінений полістирол, пінополістирол
zh: EPS - 膨胀聚苯乙烯，泡沫聚苯乙烯

en: O 7 - Other plastics, O - Other plastics, Other plastics, All other plastics, other plastic
xx: 07 OTHER, OTHER 07, 7 OTHER, OTHER 7, 07 O, O 07, 7 O, O 7, ♹
bg: O 7 - Други пластмаси, O - Други пластмаси, Други пластмаси
da: O 7 - Anden plast, O - Anden plast, Anden plast
de: O 7 - Andere Kunststoffe, O - Andere Kunststoffe, Andere Kunststoffe
fr: O 7 - Autres plastiques, O - Autres plastiques, Autres plastiques, autre plastique
hr: O 7 - ostali polimerni materijali, O - ostali polimerni materijali, ostali polimerni materijali
hu: O 7 - Egyéb műanyag, O - Egyéb műanyag, Egyéb műanyag, Más műanyag, Minden más műanyag
it: O 7 - Altre plastiche, O - Altre plastiche, Altre plastiche
nl: O 7 - Andere plastics, O - Andere plastics, Andere plastics
pl: O 7 - Inne, O - Inne, Inne
pt: O 7 - Outros plásticos, O - Outros plásticos, Outros plásticos, Todos os outros plásticos, outro plástico
ru: O 7 - Другие пластики, O - Другие пластики, Другие пластики, Другие пластмассы

en: PC - Polycarbonate, Polycarbonate
xx: PC, 07 PC, PC 07, 07PC, PC07, 7 PC, PC 7, 7PC, PC7
bg: PC - Поликарбонат, Поликарбонат
ca: PC - policarbonat, policarbonat
cs: PC - polykarbonát, polykarbonát
da: PA - Polykarbonat, Polykarbonat
de: PC - Polycarbonate, Polycarbonate
el: PC - πολυανθρακικό, πολυανθρακικό
et: PC - Polükarbonaadid, Polükarbonaadid
fi: PC - Polykarbonaatti, Polykarbonaatti
fr: PC - Polycarbonate, Polycarbonate
hr: PC - polikarbonati, polikarbonati
hu: PC - polikarbonát, polikarbonát
is: PC - Pólýkarbónat, Pólýkarbónat
it: PC - policarbonato, policarbonato
lt: PC - Polikarbonatas, Polikarbonatas
mk: PC - поликарбонат, поликарбонат
nb: PC - polykarbonat, polykarbonat
nl: PC - polycarbonaat, polycarbonaat
nn: PC - polykarbonat, polykarbonat
pl: PC - poliwęglany, poliwęglany
pt: PC - policarbonato, policarbonato
ro: PC - Policarbonat, Policarbonat
ru: PC - поликарбонаты, поликарбонаты
sr: PC - поликарбонат, поликарбонат
sv: PC - Polykarbonat, Polykarbonat
tr: PC - Polikarbonat, Polikarbonat
uk: PC - полікарбонат, полікарбонат

en: PA - Polyamide, Polyamide
xx: PA, 07 PA, PA 07, 07PA, PA07, 7 PA, PA 7, 7PA, PA7
ca: PA - poliamida, poliamida
cs: PA - polyamid, polyamid
de: PA - Polyamide, Polyamide
el: PA - Πολυαμίδιο, Πολυαμίδιο
es: PA - poliamida, poliamida
et: PA - Polüamiid, Polüamiid
fi: PA - Polyamidi, Polyamidi
fr: PA - Polyamide, Polyamide, PA - Polyamide (PA 66 - Nylon)
hr: PA - poliamid, poliamidi
hu: PA - poliamid, poliamid
it: PA - Poliammide, Poliammide
lt: PA - Poliamidas, Poliamidas
nb: PA - polyamid, polyamid
nl: PA - polyamide, polyamide
nn: PA - polyamid, polyamid
pl: PA - poliamidy, poliamidy
pt: PA - poliamida, poliamida
ro: PA - Poliamidă, Poliamidă
ru: PA - Полиамиды, Полиамиды
sk: PA - Polyamid, Polyamid
sv: PA - polyamid, polyamid
tr: PA - Poliamit, Poliamit
uk: PA - Поліамід, Поліамід

en: PU/PUR - Polyurethane, Polyurethane
xx: PU/PUR, PU, PUR
bg: PU/PUR - Полиуретан, Полиуретан
ca: PU/PUR - Poliuretà, Poliuretà
cs: PU/PUR - Polyuretan, Polyuretan
da: PU/PUR - Polyurethan, Polyurethan
de: PU/PUR - Polyurethan, Polyurethan
el: PU/PUR - Πολυουρεθάνη, Πολυουρεθάνη
es: PU/PUR - Poliuretano, Poliuretano
et: PU/PUR - Polüuretaan, Polüuretaan
fi: PU/PUR - Polyuretaani, Polyuretaani
hr: PU/PUR - Poliuretan, Poliuretan
hu: PU/PUR - Poliuretán, Poliuretán
is: PU/PUR - Pólýúretan, Pólýúretan
it: PU/PUR - Poliuretano, Poliuretano
lt: PU/PUR - Poliuretanas, Poliuretanas
mk: PU/PUR - полиуретан, полиуретан
nb: PU/PUR - Polyuretan, Polyuretan
nl: PU/PUR - Polyurethaan, Polyurethaan
nn: PU/PUR - Polyuretan, Polyuretan
pl: PU/PUR - Poliuretan, Poliuretan
pt: PU/PUR - Poliuretano, Poliuretano
ro: PU/PUR - Poliuretan, Poliuretan
ru: PU/PUR - полиуретан, полиуретан
sk: PU/PUR - Polyuretán, Polyuretán
sr: PU/PUR - полиуретан, полиуретан
sv: PU/PUR - Polyuretan, Polyuretan
tr: PU/PUR - Poliüretan, Poliüretan
uk: PU/PUR - поліуретан, поліуретан

en: ABS - Acrylonitrile butadiene styrene, Acrylonitrile butadiene styrene
xx: ABS, 07 ABS, ABS 07, 07ABS, ABS07, 7 ABS, ABS 7, 7ABS, ABS7, 9 ABS, ABS 9, 09 ABS, ABS 09
bg: ABS - Акрилонитрил-бутадиен-стирен, Акрилонитрил-бутадиен-стирен
ca: ABS - Acrilonitril butadiè estirè, Acrilonitril butadiè estirè
cs: ABS - Akrylonitrilbutadienstyren, Akrylonitrilbutadienstyren
de: ABS - Acrylnitril-Butadien-Styrol, Acrylnitril-Butadien-Styrol, Acrylnitril-Butadien-Styrol-Copolymer
es: ABS - Acrilonitrilo butadieno estireno, Acrilonitrilo butadieno estireno
fi: ABS - Akryylinitriilibutadieenistyreeni, Akryylinitriilibutadieenistyreeni
fr: ABS - Acrylonitrile butadiène styrène, Acrylonitrile butadiène styrène
hu: ABS - Akrilnitril-butadién-sztirol, ABS-műanyag, Akrilnitril-butadién-sztirol
it: ABS - acrilonitrile butadiene stirene, acrilonitrile butadiene stirene
nb: ABS - Akrylnitril-butadien-styren, Akrylnitril-butadien-styren
nl: ABS - Acrylonitrilbutadieenstyreen, Acrylonitril-butadieen-styreen
nn: ABS - akrylnitrilbutadienstyren, akrylnitrilbutadienstyren
pt: ABS - Acrilonitrila butadieno estireno, Acrilonitrila butadieno estireno
ru: ABS - акрилонитрил бутадиен стирол, акрилонитрил бутадиен стирол
sk: ABS - Akrylonitrilbutadiénstyrén, Akrylonitrilbutadiénstyrén
sr: ABS - акрилонитрил бутадиен стирен, акрилонитрил бутадиен стирен
tr: ABS - Akrilonitril bütadien stiren, Akrilonitril bütadien stiren

en: PMMA - Poly(methyl methacrylate), Poly(methyl methacrylate)
xx: PMMA, 07 PMMA, PMMA 07, 07PMMA, PMMA07, 7 PMMA, PMMA 7, 7PMMA, PMMA7
bg: PMMA - Полиметилметакрилат, Полиметилметакрилат
ca: PMMA - polimetilmetacrilat, polimetilmetacrilat
cs: PMMA - Polymethylmethakrylát, Polymethylmethakrylát
da: PMMA - Akryl, Akryl
de: PMMA - Polymethylmethacrylat, Polymethylmethacrylat, Acrylglas, Plexiglas
el: PMMA - Πολυμεθακρυλικό μεθύλιο, Πολυμεθακρυλικό μεθύλιο
es: PMMA - polimetilmetacrilato, polimetilmetacrilato
et: PMMA - polümetüülmetakrülaat, polümetüülmetakrülaat
fi: PMMA - akryyli, akryyli
fr: PMMA - Polyméthacrylate de méthyle, Poly(méthacrylate de méthyle)
ga: PMMA - Peirspéacs, Peirspéacs
hu: PMMA - poli-metil-metakrilát, poli-metil-metakrilát
it: PMMA - polimetilmetacrilato, polimetilmetacrilato
nb: PMMA - Polymetylmetakrylat, Polymetylmetakrylat
nl: PMMA - polymethylmethacrylaat, polymethylmethacrylaat
nn: PMMA - polymetylmetakrylat, polymetylmetakrylat
pl: PMMA - polimetakrylan metylu, poli(metakrylan metylu)
pt: PMMA - acrílico, acrílico
ru: PMMA - органическое стекло, органическое стекло
sk: PMMA - Polymetylmetakrylát, Polymetylmetakrylát
sl: PMMA - polimetilmetaakrilat, polimetilmetaakrilat
sr: PMMA - плексиглас, плексиглас, pleksiglas
sv: PMMA - polymetylmetakrylat, polymetylmetakrylat
tr: PMMA - Pleksi, Pleksi
uk: PMMA - органічне скло, органічне скло